Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
PART 4 Preventing Spread of Livestock Diseases

Cross references.

Powers and duties of Commissioner regarding inspection of cattle, sheep, horses, and other animals, before entry into slaughtering, packing, or other similar establishments, §

26-2-102

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Transportation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-1.

Interstate movement health requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-2.

Intrastate health requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-3.

4-4-60.
Extermination of parasites and development of livestock industry under supervision and control of Commissioner; employment of inspectors and veterinarians; public report.

The work of exterminating the cattle fever tick, screwworm, and other parasites and of developing the livestock industry in this state shall be under the supervision and control of the Commissioner, who is authorized to employ persons qualified to act as livestock inspectors and supervising veterinarians. The Commissioner shall publish in print or electronically a detailed statement annually of the expenditures and progress of this work for free public distribution.

History.

Ga. L. 1912, p. 22, § 2; Code 1933, § 62-1012; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

4-4-61.
Duties of livestock inspectors and supervising veterinarians generally.

It shall be the duty of all livestock inspectors and supervising veterinarians employed by the Commissioner to enforce the provisions of this part and any rule, regulation, or order made pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1912, p. 22, § 3; Code 1933, § 62-1013.

4-4-62.
Right of entry of inspectors.

The Commissioner or any duly authorized livestock inspector is authorized and empowered, in the discharge of the duties imposed upon him by this part, to enter the premises or any barn or building where livestock are temporarily or permanently kept in this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 131, § 6; Civil Code 1910, § 2078; Code 1933, § 62-1008.

4-4-63.
Appointment of federal livestock inspectors as state livestock inspectors.

The Commissioner may appoint or commission federal veterinarians or livestock inspectors to work as state livestock inspectors, provided that they shall act without pay from the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 131, § 9; Civil Code 1910, § 2081; Code 1933, § 62-1010.

4-4-64.
Establishment and maintenance of quarantine lines for protection of livestock generally.

As used in this Code section, the term “animal” means the domestic animals and livestock of this state, including poultry.

In addition to any other quarantine and inspection duties imposed by law, the Commissioner shall establish quarantine lines against the introduction of any animals, any animal carcasses or parts thereof, any biological products or preparations, or any live viruses or other disease vectors when in his judgment such a quarantine is necessary for the protection of the livestock of this state from any contagious or infectious disease. The Commissioner is authorized to make such rules and regulations as he may deem necessary to prevent, suppress, control, and eradicate such contagious or infectious diseases. The Commissioner may allow the movement into the quarantined area of the types of animals or products against which quarantine is imposed when, after inspection, he is satisfied that the animals or products being moved into the quarantined area are free of disease or that they will be handled so as not to introduce or spread disease.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 16.

Cross references.

Quarantine powers of Commissioner pertaining to control of equine diseases, §

4-4-120

.

4-4-65.
Maintenance of quarantine along state borders to prevent introduction of parasites or diseases into state.

The Commissioner shall provide and maintain an effective quarantine along the borders of Georgia by the use of patrols or in such other manner as in his judgment will prevent the introduction of cattle fever tick, screwworm, or other parasites or other contagious or infectious diseases into the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1924, p. 78, § 1; Code 1933, § 62-1019.

4-4-66.
Movement of cattle infested with parasites.

The movement of cattle infested with cattle fever tick, screwworm, or other parasites into, within, or through the state at any time or for any purpose, except as provided for in this part, is prohibited.

History.

Ga. L. 1918, p. 256, § 1; Code 1933, § 62-1014.

4-4-67.
Establishment of quarantines in areas in which livestock affected with or exposed to contagious or infectious disease; transportation of livestock within and from quarantined areas.

The Commissioner or any duly authorized livestock inspector is authorized and required to quarantine any stall, lot, yard, pasture, field, farm, premises, packing house, rendering plant, town, city, militia district, county, or any part thereof or the whole of the state when he shall determine that livestock in such place or places are affected with, exposed to, or suspected of being exposed to a contagious or infectious disease or with anything which might cause such disease. The Commissioner or any livestock inspector shall provide written or printed notice of the establishment of such quarantine to the owners or keepers of such livestock and to the proper officers of railroad, steamboat, motor vehicle, or other transportation companies doing business in or through the quarantined territory.

No such transportation company shall receive for transportation or shall transport livestock from any quarantined area to any nonquarantined area, except as provided for in this part. No person, company, corporation, or other entity shall drive or cause to be driven or permit to go astray any livestock from any quarantined area to any nonquarantined area, except as provided for in this part.

Livestock may be moved within a quarantined area or removed from a quarantined area only under and in compliance with the rules and regulations of the Commissioner. It shall be unlawful to move livestock within or from a quarantined area in any other manner or under any conditions other than those prescribed by the rules and regulations of the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 131, §§ 3, 4; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2075, 2076; Code 1933, §§ 62-1005, 62-1006; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 17.

4-4-68.
Employment of veterinary surgeon or expert.

When the Commissioner receives a request to investigate, treat, or otherwise prevent the spread of an infectious or contagious disease affecting the livestock of a county, he shall employ a competent veterinary surgeon or expert to investigate the causes of the disease, to treat the same, and otherwise prevent its spread.

The Commissioner is authorized to fix the compensation of the veterinary surgeon or expert.

History.

Ga. L. 1905, p. 121, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2069; Code 1933, § 62-1011; Ga. L. 1956, p. 332, § 1.

4-4-69.
Regulation of manufacture and use of disease vectors.

As used in this Code section, the term “disease vector” means any agent or material which has the power to produce or spread disease in livestock.

No experimental or research work, except at or under the direction of the College of Veterinary Medicine of the University of Georgia, the Georgia Poultry Improvement Association Laboratory, the College of Agricultural and Environmental Sciences of the University of Georgia, and the state agricultural experiment stations, shall be carried on in this state with any live virus or any other disease vector. No such virus or disease vector shall be manufactured or distributed in this state except under permit issued by the Commissioner and conditioned, as in his judgment necessary, to prevent the spread of such disease.

This Code section shall not apply to the county health departments, the Department of Public Health, the United States Department of Health and Human Services, accredited medical and dental colleges and universities, approved hospitals, approved medical centers, or foundations engaged in medical research, diagnosis, or treatment of the diseases of man.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 18; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Department of Public Health” for “Department of Community Health” in subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article, “Health: Department of Public Health,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

4-4-70.
Conduct of programs to eradicate contagious or infectious diseases generally.

Whenever it is determined by the Commissioner, in cooperation with the United States Department of Agriculture, that a contagious or infectious disease should be eradicated, the Commissioner is authorized to take whatever steps are necessary to eradicate the disease. Owners, renters, or persons in possession of livestock or premises infected with such a disease shall be required to disinfect the premises and to destroy the cause or causes of the contagious or infectious disease, including the destruction of those livestock on the premises, under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner or his duly authorized representative. The cost of destroying the cause or causes or sources of infection of a contagious or infectious disease which is sought to be eradicated shall be borne by the owner, renter, or person in possession of the infected or quarantined premises. However, when budget conditions permit or when federal matching funds are available, the Commissioner may participate in the cost of eradication and is authorized to expend such funds as are available.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 21.

4-4-71.
Cooperation of Commissioner with other officials in establishing quarantine lines.

The Commissioner shall cooperate with officials of other states and with the secretary of agriculture of the United States in establishing quarantine lines.

History.

Ga. L. 1899, p. 97, § 3; Civil Code 1910, § 2072; Code 1933, § 62-1002; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 20.

4-4-72.
Indemnification of owners of livestock destroyed in eradication of diseases.

The Commissioner is authorized, in cooperation with the United States Department of Agriculture, to indemnify the owner of livestock destroyed in eradicating any infectious or contagious disease, upon such basis and appraisal as the federal government prescribes; but in no event shall the state pay more than one-half of the indemnity and cost incident to the eradication.

In the case of public stockyards, meat packing establishments, slaughterhouses, community sales, and licensed garbage feeders, the state shall not pay in participation with the United States Department of Agriculture more than one-third of the indemnity and cost incident to the eradication. However, the Commissioner may make indemnity payments inapplicable to garbage feeders if in any case he finds the feeding of garbage to be a source of such disease.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation which shall violate any quarantine law or rule and regulation thereunder shall be ineligible for indemnity.

The Commissioner is authorized, in the eradication of any infectious or contagious disease, to indemnify the owner of livestock destroyed in eradicating the disease in those instances in which the United States Department of Agriculture cannot participate in the payment of the indemnity.

The limits on the amount of payment to be made by the state as set out in this Code section shall have no application to payments in excess of such limits authorized by law for the purpose of elimination of swine mycobacteriosis.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 22; Ga. L. 1957, p. 488, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1032, § 12.

4-4-73.
Transfer of state funds to eradication programs for purposes of matching federal funds.

For the purpose of matching available federal funds where state funds are insufficient, the Governor may transfer money from any available funds in the state treasury to a program of eradication of a contagious or infectious disease, which program is supported by federal funds, contingent on matching state funds. The money so transferred shall be repaid to the fund from which it was taken when money becomes available for that purpose by legislative appropriation or otherwise.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 23.

4-4-74.
Penalty for violation of quarantine.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation which violates any quarantine provision, rule, or regulation established by the Commissioner under the authority of law for the protection of the livestock and domestic animals of this state shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 19.

4-4-75.
Interfering with Commissioner or livestock inspectors.

Any person who shall forcibly resist, oppose, assault, prevent, impede, or interfere with the Commissioner or any duly authorized livestock inspector in the execution of his duties or on account of the execution of such duty shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1909, p. 131, § 6; Penal Code 1910, § 583; Code 1933, § 62-9911.

4-4-76.
Importation of diseased livestock.

Any person who shall knowingly import within the limits of this state any livestock with contagious diseases, except distemper, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1901, p. 82, §§ 1, 2; Penal Code 1910, § 581; Code 1933, § 62-9910.